Maryland, session 2026, HB1258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) SECTION 5–508 OF THE FAMILY LAW ARTICLE; OR
Article – Family Law
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Child placement agency” means:
(1) a local department; or
(2) a private agency that is licensed by the Social Services Administration
of the Department under § 5–507 of this title, or by a comparable governmental unit of
another state, to place children.

HOUSE BILL 1258 3
(e) “Department” means the State Department of Human Services.
5–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means:
(1) the Social Services Administration of the Department; or
(2) any other unit within the Department to which the Secretary of Human
Services has delegated in writing specified responsibilities of the Administration under this
subtitle.
5–507.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person shall be licensed by the
Administration as a child placement agency before the person may engage in the placement
of minor children in homes or with individuals.
(b) A license is not required:
(1) for a person to place a child with an individual related to the child by
blood or marriage within 4 degrees of consanguinity or affinity under the civil law rule;
(2) except as provided in § 5–3B–12 of this title, for a parent or grandparent
of a child to place the child directly, without the intervention of any other person except the
recipient of the child; or
(3) for a lawyer to prepare pleadings necessary to accomplish the adoption
of a child or to perform any other function associated with the normal practice of law.
5–508.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ADVERTISE” MEANS TO ISSUE ANY COMMUNICATION,
SOLICITATION, OR OUTREACH INTENDED TO OFFER OR PROMOTE PRIVATE CHILD
PLACEMENT SERVICES, INCLUDING COMMUNICATIONS ISSUED VIA:
(1) PRINT OR DIGITAL MEDIA;
(2) INTERNET WEBSITES, SOCIAL MEDIA, OR ONLINE PLATFORMS;
(3) RADIO, TELEVISION, OR DIGITAL STREAMING SERVICES;
(4) DIRECT MAIL, E–MAIL, OR TEXT MESSAGING; OR

HOUSE BILL 1258
(5) ANY OTHER MEDIUM REASONABLY CALCULATED TO REACH
RESIDENTS OF THE STATE.
(B) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT ADVERTISE ADOPTION SERVICES IN THE
STATE UNLESS THE PERSON IS A LOCAL DEPARTMENT OR A CHILD PLACEMENT
AGENCY LICENSED BY THE ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 5–507 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE PROHIBITION IN THIS SUBSECTION INCLUDES
ADVERTISEMENTS THAT:
(I) ORIGINATE IN THE STATE;
(II) ORIGINATE OUTSIDE THE STATE;
(III) TARGET STATE RESIDENTS DIRECTLY; AND
(IV) TARGET STATE RESIDENTS INDIRECTLY THROUGH
GENERAL DISTRIBUTION.
(C) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY:
(1) INVESTIGATE ALLEGED VIOLATIONS OF THIS SECTION;
(2) ISSUE A CEASE AND DESIST ORDER TO A PERSON THAT THE
ADMINISTRATION BELIEVES TO BE VIOLATING THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION; AND
(3) NOTIFY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IF THERE IS REASON TO
BELIEVE THAT A PERSON HAS COMMITTED A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(D) ON RECEIVING NOTICE FROM THE ADMINISTRATION UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(3) OF THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN
ACTION FOR RELIEF IN A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION, INCLUDING AN
ACTION SEEKING:
(1) A CIVIL PENALTY OF $10,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(2) ANY OTHER DAMAGES AUTHORIZED BY LAW A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1258 5
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.